New Jersey, session 222, S3683.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:28-4 is amended to read as follows: 2C:28-4.     a.  Falsely incriminating another. A person who knowingly gives or causes to be given false information to any law enforcement officer with purpose to implicate another commits a crime of the third degree, except the offense is a crime of the second degree if the false information which the actor gave or caused to be given would implicate the person in a crime of the first or second degree. For the purposes of this subsection, knowledge of the grade of the crime about which the defendant gave false information is not an element of the offense and it shall not be a defense that the defendant did not know of the grade of the crime. b.    Fictitious reports.  A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if [he] the person: (1)   [Reports] reports or causes to be reported to law enforcement authorities an offense or other incident within their concern knowing that it did not occur; or (2)   [Pretends] pretends to furnish or causes to be furnished [such] law enforcement authorities with information relating to an offense or incident when he knows he has no information relating to [such] the offense or incident. c.  It shall be a crime of the third degree to knowingly file a false report or give false information to law enforcement authorities with the purpose to implicate a law enforcement officer in a crime, offense, or professional infraction that would warrant disciplinary action against the law enforcement officer. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other law, a conviction under this subsection shall not merge with a conviction under subsection a. or b. of this section. (cf: P.L.2015, c.175, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.